Utah statutes.
19-3-201.1.   Definitions.

As used in this compact:

(1)  "Facility" means any site, location, structure, or property used or to be used for the storage, treatment, or disposal of low-level waste, excluding federal waste facilities.

(2)  "Generator" means any person, partnership, association, corporation, or any other entity whatsoever which, as a part of its activities, produces low-level radioactive waste.

(3)  "Host state" means a state in which a facility is located.

(4) (a)  "Low-level waste" means waste material which contains radioactive nuclides emitting primarily beta or gamma radiation, or both, in concentrations or quantities which exceed applicable federal or state standards for unrestricted release.

(b)  "Low-level waste" does not include waste containing more than 10 nanocuries of transuranic contaminants per gram of material, nor spent reactor fuel, nor material classified as either high-level waste or waste which is unsuited for disposal by near-surface burial under any applicable federal regulations.



Enacted by Chapter 314, 2001 General Session

